Tennessee, session 114, HB0793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 30, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, an LEA or public charter school may
enroll, or refuse to enroll, a student who is unlawfully present in the United States.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0793
001830
- 1 -